North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52 Public Employees Retirement System
54-52-05.
Membership and assessments — Employer payment of employee contributions.

Every eligible participating political subdivision employee, at the time the political subdivision joins the plan must so state in writing if the employee concurs in the plan and all future eligible employees of the participating political subdivision are participating members in the plan and must be enrolled in the plan within the first month of employment. Except as otherwise provided by law, every other eligible governmental unit employee of a participating governmental unit is a participating member in the plan and must be enrolled in the plan within the first month of employment. An employee who was not enrolled in the retirement system when eligible to participate must be enrolled immediately upon notice of the employee’s eligibility, unless the employee waives in writing the employee’s right to participate for the previous time of eligibility, to avoid contributing to the fund for past service. An employee who is eligible for normal retirement who accepts a retirement benefit under this chapter and who subsequently becomes employed with a participating employer other than the employer with which the employee was employed at the time the employee retired under this chapter may, before being re-enrolled in the retirement plan within the first month of employment, elect to permanently waive future participation in the retirement plan and the retiree health program and maintain that employee’s retirement status. An employee making this election is not required to make any future employee contributions to the public employees retirement system nor is the employee’s employer required to make any further contributions on behalf of that employee.

Each member must be assessed and required to pay monthly four percent of the monthly salary or wage paid to the member, and such assessment must be deducted and retained out of such salary in equal monthly installments commencing with the first month of employment. Member contributions increase by one percent of the monthly salary or wage paid to the member beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2012, and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2013, and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2014.

Each employer, at its option, may pay all or a portion of the employee contributions required by subsection 2 and sections 54-52-06.1, 54-52-06.2, 54-52-06.3, and 54-52-06.4 or the employee contributions required to purchase service credit on a pretax basis pursuant to subsection 5 of section 54-52-17.4. Employees may not receive the contributed amounts directly once the employer has elected to pay the employee contributions. The amount paid must be paid by the employer in lieu of contributions by the employee. If the state determines not to pay the contributions, the amount that would have been paid must continue to be deducted from the employee’s compensation. If contributions are paid by the employer, they must be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under this code and the federal Internal Revenue Code. If contributions are paid by the employer, they may not be included as gross income of the employee in determining tax treatment under this code and the Internal Revenue Code until they are distributed or made available. The employer shall pay these employee contributions from the same source of funds used in paying compensation to the employee. The employer shall pay these contributions by effecting an equal cash reduction in the gross salary of the employee or by an offset against future salary increases or by a contribution of a reduction in gross salary and offset against future salary increases. If employee contributions are paid by the employer, they must be treated for the purposes of this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as employee contributions made prior to the date on which employee contributions were assumed by the employer. An employer exercising its option under this subsection shall report its choice to the board in writing.

For compensation earned after August 1, 2009, all employee contributions required under section 54-52-06.1 and the job service North Dakota retirement plan, and not otherwise paid under subsection 3, must be paid by the employer in lieu of contributions by the member. All contributions paid by the employer under this subsection must be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under this code and the Internal Revenue Code. Contributions paid by the employer under this subsection may not be included as gross income of the member in determining tax treatment under this code and the Internal Revenue Code until the contributions are distributed or made available. Contributions paid by the employer in accordance with this subsection must be treated for the purposes of this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as member contributions made before the date the contributions were assumed by the employer. The employer shall pay these member contributions from the same source of funds used in paying compensation to the employee. The employer shall pay these contributions by effecting an equal cash reduction in the gross salary of the employee. The employer shall continue making payments under this section unless otherwise specifically provided for under the agency’s biennial appropriation or by amendment to law.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 5; 1969, ch. 456, § 7; 1969, ch. 457, § 6; 1973, ch. 120, § 59; 1973, ch. 246, § 8; 1977, ch. 499, § 8; 1979, ch. 570, § 2; 1983, ch. 217, § 4; 1983, ch. 573, § 2; 1989, ch. 662, § 3; 1991, ch. 626, § 3; 1995, ch. 527, § 3; 1995, ch. 528, § 4; 1999, ch. 479, § 1; 2003, ch. 497, § 3; 2003, ch. 498, § 7; 2005, ch. 531, § 8; 2005, ch. 532, § 1; 2009, ch. 512, §
2; 2009, ch. 514, § 8; 2011, ch. 432, § 4; 2013, ch. 431, § 6; 2015, ch. 259, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 57, § 13, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-06.
Employer’s contribution to retirement plan — Report to the legislative assembly.

Each governmental unit shall contribute an amount equal to four and twelve-hundredths percent of the monthly salary or wage of a participating member. Governmental unit contributions increase by one percent of the monthly salary or wage of a participating member beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2012; with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the reporting period of January 2013; and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2014. For a participating member who first enrolls after December 31, 2019, the governmental unit shall contribute an additional amount equal to one and fourteen-hundredths percent of the monthly salary or wage of the participating member.

For those members who elect to exercise their rights under section 54-52-17.14, the employing governmental unit, or in the case of a member not presently under covered employment the most recent employing governmental unit, shall pay the associated employer contribution. If the employee’s contribution is paid by the governmental unit under subsection 3 of section 54-52-05, the employer unit shall contribute, in addition, an amount equal to the required employee’s contribution. Each governmental unit shall pay the contribution monthly, or in the case of an election made pursuant to section 54-52-17.14 a lump sum, into the retirement fund from the governmental unit’s funds appropriated for payroll and salary or any other funds available for these purposes. Any governmental unit failing to pay the contributions monthly, or in the case of an election made pursuant to section 54-52-17.14 a lump sum, or failing to otherwise comply with the board’s established wage reporting or payroll reporting process requirements, is subject to a civil penalty of fifty dollars and, as interest, one percent of the amount due for each month of delay or fraction of a month after the payment became due. In lieu of assessing a civil penalty or one percent per month, or both, interest at the actuarial rate of return may be assessed for each month the contributions are delinquent. If contributions are paid within ninety days of the date the contributions became due, penalty and interest to be paid on delinquent contributions may be waived.

An employer is required to submit contributions for any past eligible employee who was employed after July 1, 1977, for which contributions were not made if the employee would have been eligible to become vested had the employee participated and if the employee elects to join the public employees retirement system. Employer contributions may not be assessed for eligible service that an employee has waived pursuant to subsection 1 of section 54-52-05.

The board shall report to each session of the legislative assembly the contributions necessary, as determined by the actuarial study, to maintain the fund’s actuarial soundness.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 6; 1969, ch. 456, § 8; 1969, ch. 457, § 7; 1973, ch. 246, § 9; 1975, ch. 490, § 2; 1977, ch. 499, § 9; 1983, ch. 217, § 5; 1989, ch. 445, § 2; 1991, ch. 600, § 13; 1991, ch. 630, § 4; 1995, ch. 527, § 4; 2005, ch. 531, § 9; 2011, ch. 432, § 5; 2013, ch. 431, § 7; 2019, ch. 459, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 438, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Cross-References.

Contribution to retiree health benefits fund, see N.D.C.C. § 54-52.1-03.2.

54-52-06.1.
Contribution by supreme and district court judges — Employer contribution.

Each judge of the supreme or district court who is a member of the public employees retirement system must be assessed and required to pay monthly five percent of the judge’s monthly salary. Member contributions increase by one percent of the judge’s monthly salary beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2012, and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the reporting period of January 2013, and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2014. The assessment must be deducted and retained out of the judge’s salary in equal monthly installments. The state shall contribute an amount equal to fourteen and fifty-two one-hundredths percent of the monthly salary of a supreme or district court judge who is a participating member of the system, which matching contribution must be paid from its funds appropriated for salary, or from any other funds available for such purposes. State contributions increase by one percent of the monthly salary of a supreme or district court judge who is a participating member of the system beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2012, and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2013, and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2014. If the judge’s contribution is paid by the state under subsection 3 of section 54-52-05, the state shall contribute, in addition, an amount equal to the required judge’s contribution.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 246, § 10; 1977, ch. 499, § 10; 1983, ch. 217, § 6; 1983, ch. 576, § 2; 1985, ch. 582, § 1; 1989, ch. 445, § 3; 1991, ch. 627, § 2; 2011, ch. 432, § 6; 2013, ch. 431, § 8.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-06.2.
Contribution by national guard security officers or firefighters — Employer contribution.

Each national guard security officer or firefighter who is a member of the public employees retirement system is assessed and shall pay monthly four percent of the employee’s monthly salary. Member contributions increase by one-half of one percent of the member’s monthly salary beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2014. Effective August 1, 2015, each national guard security officer or firefighter who is a participating member of the plan under this section becomes a participating member of the plan under section 54-52-06.4 and the board shall thereafter manage any account balance associated with those participating members under section 54-52-06.4. After July 31, 2015, a new eligible employee may not become a participating member of the plan under this section. The assessment must be deducted and retained out of the employee’s salary in equal monthly installments. The national guard security officer’s or firefighter’s employer shall contribute an amount determined by the board to be actuarially required to support the level of benefits specified in section 54-52-17. The employer’s contribution must be paid from funds appropriated for salary or from any other funds available for such purposes. If the security officer’s or firefighter’s assessment is paid by the employer under subsection 3 of section 54-52-05, the employer shall contribute, in addition, an amount equal to the required national guard security officer’s or firefighter’s assessment.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 626, § 4; 1993, ch. 533, § 1; 2013, ch. 431, § 9; 2015, ch. 424, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 424, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-06.3.
Contribution by peace officers, firefighters, and correctional officers employed by political subdivisions — Employer contribution.

Each peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer employed by a political subdivision that enters an agreement with the retirement board on behalf of its peace officers, firefighters, and correctional officers separately from its other employees and who is a member of the public employees retirement system is assessed and shall pay monthly four percent of the employee’s monthly salary. Peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer contributions increase by one-half of one percent of the member’s monthly salary beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2012, and with an additional increase of one-half of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2013, and with an additional increase of one-half of one percent, beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2014. The assessment must be deducted and retained out of the employee’s salary in equal monthly installments. The peace officer’s, firefighter’s, or correctional officer’s employer shall contribute an amount determined by the board to be actuarially required to support the level of benefits specified in section 54-52-17. If the peace officer’s, firefighter’s, or correctional officer’s assessment is paid by the employer under subsection 3 of section 54-52-05, the employer shall contribute, in addition, an amount equal to the required peace officer’s, firefighter’s, or correctional officer’s assessment.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 497, § 4; 2011, ch. 432, § 7; 2013, ch. 431, § 10; 2017, ch. 379, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 10 of chapter 431, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-06.4.
Contribution by peace officers employed by the bureau of criminal investigation or security officers employed by the national guard — Employer contribution.

Each peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation who is a member of the public employees retirement system is assessed and shall pay monthly four percent of the employee’s monthly salary. Peace officer contributions increase by one percent of the member’s monthly salary beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2012, and with an additional increase of one percent, beginning with the reporting period of January 2013. Effective August 1, 2015, each national guard security officer who is a member of the public employee’s retirement system is assessed and monthly shall pay six percent of the employee’s monthly salary. National guard security officer contributions decrease by one-half of one percent of the member’s monthly salary beginning with the monthly reporting period of January 2016. The assessment must be deducted and retained out of the employee’s salary in equal monthly installments. The peace officer’s or security officer’s employer shall contribute an amount determined by the board to be actuarially required to support the level of benefits specified in section 54-52-17. The employer’s contribution must be paid from funds appropriated for salary or from any other funds available for such purposes. If the peace officer’s or security officer’s assessment is paid by the employer under subsection 3 of section 54-52-05, the employer shall contribute, in addition, an amount equal to the required peace officer’s or security officer’s assessment.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 512, § 3; 2011, ch. 432, § 8; 2015, ch. 424, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 424, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-52-06.5.
Reduction in member and employer contributions.

The required increase in the amount of member and employer contributions under sections 54-52-02.9, 54-52-05, 54-52-06, 54-52-06.1, 54-52-06.3, 54-52.6-02, and 54-52.6-09 must be reduced to the rate in effect on July 1, 2013, effective on the July first that follows the first valuation of the public employees retirement system main system showing a ratio of the actuarial value of assets to the actuarial accrued liability of the public employees retirement system main system that is equal to or greater than one hundred percent.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 431, § 11; 2015, ch. 424, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 424, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-07.
Governmental unit contribution is retirement contribution.

The governmental unit contribution to a retirement plan must be considered a retirement contribution and not an additional compensation. This applies specifically to elected and appointed officials whose maximum annual compensation is set by statute or by state, county, city, or school district governing bodies, boards, or commissions. The retirement contribution may not be considered by the employee as income in computing the employee’s net income for purposes of state income tax until the moneys come under the control of the employee.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 7; 1969, ch. 456, § 9; 1969, ch. 457, § 8; 1995, ch. 528, § 5.

54-52-08.
State income tax deductions.

For the purposes of state income tax, the assessment imposed by this chapter on the employee must be treated in accordance with existing state statutes on state income tax.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 8.

54-52-09.
Exemption from state premium tax.

Premiums, consideration for annuities, and membership fees are exempt from premium taxes payable pursuant to section 26.1-03-17.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 9; 1983, ch. 319, § 32.

54-52-10.
Allocation of funds.

The board shall maintain such funds and accounts as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. Any and all expenses incurred by or for the operation of the retirement plan must be paid from the funds contributed pursuant to sections 54-52-06 and 54-52-06.1.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 10; 1969, ch. 456, § 10; 1969, ch. 457, § 9; 1973, ch. 246, § 11; 1977, ch. 499, § 11.

54-52-10.1.
Payment of benefits and other costs.

The board shall use funds under its control both before and after July 1, 1977, to administer this chapter and pay benefits authorized by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 499, § 12.

54-52-11.
Vesting — Vesting schedule of agency, county, city, or school district contribution. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 499, § 17.

54-52-11.1.
Vesting of employer contributions.

Except for supreme and district court judges, who are not eligible for benefits under this section, a member’s account balance includes vested employer contributions equal to the member’s contributions to the deferred compensation plan for public employees under chapter 54-52.2, or member contributions to other participating employer supplemental Internal Revenue Code section 457 or 403(b) retirement programs as approved by the board, with the minimum member contribution being twenty-five dollars. However, the vested employer contribution may not exceed:

For months one through twelve of service credit, twenty-five dollars or one percent of the member’s monthly salary, whichever is greater.

For months thirteen through twenty-four of service credit, twenty-five dollars or two percent of the member’s monthly salary, whichever is greater.

For months twenty-five through thirty-six of service credit, twenty-five dollars or three percent of the member’s monthly salary, whichever is greater.

For service exceeding thirty-six months, twenty-five dollars or four percent of the member’s monthly salary, whichever is greater.

The vested employer contribution may not exceed four percent of the member’s monthly salary.

Vested employer contributions must be credited monthly to the member’s account balance.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 478, § 9.

54-52-12.
Exemption from taxation and judicial process — Prohibition of assignment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 386, § 2.

54-52-13.
Deposit of moneys — Appropriation.

All moneys, including but not limited to employers’ contributions, employees’ contributions, grants, donations, legacies, and devises for the benefit of the fund, must be deposited in the public employees retirement fund account with the Bank of North Dakota. All of said moneys, not otherwise appropriated, are hereby appropriated for the purpose of making investments for the employees retirement fund and to make payments to beneficiaries under the program.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 13; 1967, ch. 395, § 3; 1973, ch. 246, § 13; 1983, ch. 577, § 1.

54-52-13.1.
Retirement benefits — Continuing appropriation.

The funds necessary for paying prior service and service benefits, consultant fees, and making withdrawal payments and refunds, are hereby appropriated from the retirement fund for those purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 532, § 8.

54-52-14.
Acceptance of money and property by the board.

The board may take by gift, grant, devise, or bequest, any money or real or personal property or any other thing of value for the benefit of the employees retirement fund, and when received, said property becomes a part of such fund.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 14.

54-52-14.1.
Investment of moneys in fund.

Investment of the fund is under the supervision of the state investment board in accordance with chapter 21-10. Such moneys must be placed for investment only with a firm or firms whose endeavor is money management, and only after a trust agreement or contract has been executed. Investment costs may be paid directly from the fund, and are hereby appropriated for that purpose, in accordance with section 21-10-06.2.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 667, § 12.

54-52-14.2.
Interest and earnings attributable to administered funds.

All interest and earnings on funds administered by the retirement board established under chapters 39-03.1, 54-52, 54-52.1, 54-52.2, and 54-52.3 must be credited to the respective fund.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 527, § 7.

54-52-14.3.
Public employee retirement funds — Use and investment.

Any provision of law relating to the use and investment of public employee retirement funds must be deemed a part of the employment contracts of the employees participating in any public employee retirement system. All moneys from any source paid into any public employee retirement system fund created by the laws of this state must be used and invested only for the exclusive benefit of the members, retirees, and beneficiaries of that system, including the payment of system administrative costs.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 530, § 1.

54-52-15.
Accounting requirements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 458, § 1.

54-52-16.
Insurance contracts — Trust agreements.

For the purpose of establishing the funding agent or agents, the board may enter into an insurance contract, agreement, or purchase an insurance policy or policies covering all or any part of the retirement plan adopted, provided the assuring company is a North Dakota corporation or authorized to do business in the state of North Dakota, or may enter into a contract with any qualified trust company or companies, or combinations of insurance contracts and trust contracts.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 16; 1967, ch. 395, § 4.